Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1543
Person, defined.

Person shall mean any natural person, political subdivision, government agency, public or private corporation, partnership, limited liability company, joint venture, association, firm, or individual proprietorship.

Laws 1979, LB 120, § 10;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 539.
October 30, 2015